de: Enthaltene Bingokomponenten: Bingo-Kugeln; Bingo-Karten/Tafeln; Ziehungskarten/Ziehungsblatt; Whiteboard-Marker; Spielanleitung; Magnetische Marker; Marker/Stempelstifte; Ziehtrommel; Zahlen-Chips/Plättchen; Glücksrad; Aufbewahrungsbox/Koffer; Transparente Abdeck-Chips; Sonstige
bg-BG: С включени компоненти за бинго: Бинго топки; Бинго карти/дъски; Карти за водещия/списък за теглене; Маркери за бяла дъска; Книжка с инструкции; Магнитни маркери; Маркери/печати; Сфера за числа; Чипове/плочки с числа; Въртящо се колело; Кутия/чанта за съхранение; Прозрачни чипове за покриване; Други
it: Componenti del bingo inclusi: Palline da bingo; Cartelle/Tabelloni da bingo; Cartellone estrazione/scheda di chiamata; Pennarelli cancellabili a secco; Libretto di istruzioni; Segnalini magnetici; Segnalini/Marcatori; Gabbia di estrazione; Gettoni/Tessere numerate; Ruota di estrazione; Scatola/custodia; Gettoni di copertura trasparenti; Altro
fi: Mukana tulevat bingokomponentit: Bingopallot; Bingokupongit/-laudat; Huutokortit/-arkki; Valkotaulutussit; Ohjekirja; Magneettiset merkit; Tussit/leimasimet; Numerokori; Numeromerkit/-laatat; Onnenpyörä; Säilytyslaatikko/-laukku; Läpinäkyvät peitemerkit; Muu
tr: Dahil edilen bingo bileşenleri: Tombala topları; Tombala kartları/tahtaları; Okuyucu kartları/okuma sayfası; Silinebilir tahta kalemleri; Talimat kitapçığı; Manyetik işaretleyiciler; İşaretleyiciler/damgalar; Sayı küresi; Sayı pulları/taşları; Döner çark; Saklama kutusu/çantası; Şeffaf kapatma pulları; Diğer
sk-SK: Vrátane súčastí hry Bingo: Bingo loptičky; Bingo karty/hracie dosky; Karty/hárok pre vyvolávača; Nasucho stierateľné fixky; Brožúra s pokynmi; Magnetické značky; Značkovače/pečiatky; Klietka na čísla; Číselné žetóny/dieliky; Koleso šťastia; Úložný box/puzdro; Priehľadné krycie žetóny; Iné
sv: Bingodelar som ingår: Bingobollar; Bingobrickor/bräden; Utroparkort/lista; Whiteboardpennor; Instruktionshäfte; Magnetiska markörer; Markörer/duttpennor; Tombola; Nummerbrickor/-plattor; Snurrhjul; Förvaringslåda/-väska; Genomskinliga täckbrickor; Övrigt
hr-HR: Uključene komponente za bingo: Kuglice za bingo; Listići/ploče za bingo; Listići/tablica za izvlačenje; Markeri za bijelu ploču; Knjižica s uputama; Magnetski markeri; Markeri/pečati (dauberi); Bubanj za brojeve; Žetoni/pločice s brojevima; Kolo sreće (spinner); Kutija/kofer za pohranu; Prozirni žetoni za prekrivanje; Ostalo
ru: Состав набора для бинго: Шары для бинго; Карточки/доски для бинго; Карточки ведущего/лист для отметок; Маркеры сухого стирания; Буклет с инструкциями; Магнитные фишки; Маркеры/штампы (daubers); Барабан для шаров; Фишки/плитки с номерами; Колесо с рулеткой; Коробка/кейс для хранения; Прозрачные фишки для накрывания; Другое
ja: ビンゴコンポーネント付き: ビンゴボール; ビンゴカード / ボード; コーラーカード / コールシート; ホワイトボードマーカー; 取扱説明書; マグネットマーカー; マーカー / ドーバー; ナンバーケージ; ナンバーチップ / タイル; スピナーホイール; 収納ボックス / ケース; 透明カバーチップ; その他
zh-TW: 包含賓果遊戲組件: 賓果球; 賓果卡/圖板; 叫號卡/表; 白板筆; 說明手冊; 磁性標記; 標記/印章筆; 號碼搖獎機; 號碼籌碼/牌; 轉盤; 收納盒/箱; 透明標記片; 其他
ro-RO: Componente de bingo incluse: Bile de bingo; Cartoane/table de bingo; Carduri/foaie pentru strigat; Markere nepermanente; Broșură cu instrucțiuni; Markere magnetice; Markere/ștampile; Cușcă pentru numere; Jetoane/piese cu numere; Roată rotativă; Cutie/casetă de depozitare; Jetoane de acoperire transparente; Altele
nb: Inklduerte bingodeler: Bingokuler; Bingobrett; Trekkekort / trekkeliste; Whiteboard-tusjer; Instruksjonshefte; Magnetiske markører; Markører/bingotusjer; Trekketrommel; Nummerbrikker; Lykkehjul; Oppbevaringsboks/-eske; Gjennomsiktige dekkbrikker; Annet
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys bingo komponentai: Bingo kamuoliukai; Bingo kortelės / lentos; Pranešėjo kortelės / lapas; Sausai valomi žymekliai; Instrukcijų knygelė; Magnetiniai žymekliai; Žymekliai / antspaudai; Skaičių narvas; Skaičių žetonai / plytelės; Sukamasis ratas; Laikymo dėžutė / dėklas; Permatomi dengiamieji žetonai; Kita
fr: Composants du bingo inclus: Boules de bingo; Cartes/grilles de bingo; Cartes d’annonceur/feuille d’appel; Marqueurs effaçables à sec; Livret d’instructions; Marqueurs magnétiques; Marqueurs/tampons; Boulier; Jetons/tuiles de numéros; Roue tournante; Boîte/étui de rangement; Jetons transparents de couverture; Autre
es: Componentes de bingo incluidos: Bolas de bingo; Cartones/tableros de bingo; Cartas de canto/hoja de números; Marcadores de borrado en seco; Folleto de instrucciones; Marcadores magnéticos; Marcadores/rotuladores; Bombo numerado; Fichas/baldosas numéricas; Ruleta giratoria; Caja/estuche de almacenamiento; Fichas transparentes para cubrir; Otro
ko: 빙고 포함 구성품: 빙고 공; 빙고 카드/보드; 콜러 카드/콜 시트; 화이트보드 마커; 설명서; 자석 마커; 마커/도버; 번호 케이지; 번호 칩/타일; 스피너 휠; 보관함/케이스; 투명 커버 칩; 기타
zh-CN: 包含宾果游戏组件: 宾果球; 宾果卡/板; 叫号卡/叫号表; 干擦记号笔; 说明书; 磁性记号笔; 记号笔/涂抹笔; 号码笼; 号码筹码/牌; 转盘; 收纳盒/箱; 透明盖筹码; 其他
da: Bingokomponenter medfølger: Bingokugler; Bingoplader; Opråbskort/opråbsark; Whiteboard-tuscher; Vejledningshæfte; Magnetiske markører; Markører/tusch; Nummertromle; Nummerbrikker; Lykkehjul; Opbevaringsæske/-kuffert; Gennemsigtige dækbrikker; Andet
pt-BR: Componentes de bingo incluídos: Bolas de bingo; Cartelas/tabuleiros de bingo; Cartões/folha de chamadas; Marcadores de quadro branco; Livreto de instruções; Marcadores magnéticos; Marcadores/carimbos; Globo de bingo; Fichas/pedras numéricas; Roleta; Caixa/estojo de armazenamento; Fichas de cobertura transparentes; Outro
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα bingo: Μπάλες Bingo; Κάρτες/ταμπλό Bingo; Κάρτες/φύλλο κλήρωσης; Μαρκαδόροι λευκοπίνακα; Βιβλιαράκι οδηγιών; Μαγνητικοί δείκτες; Μαρκαδόροι/σφραγιδάκια (Daubers); Κληρωτίδα; Μάρκες/πλακίδια αριθμών; Τροχός κλήρωσης; Κουτί/θήκη αποθήκευσης; Διαφανείς μάρκες επικάλυψης; Άλλο
en: Bingo components included: Bingo balls; Bingo cards/boards; Caller cards/call sheet; Dry-erase markers; Instruction booklet; Magnetic markers; Markers/daubers; Number cage; Number chips/tiles; Spinner wheel; Storage box/case; Transparent cover chips; Other
sl-SI: Vključene komponente za bingo: Bingo kroglice; Bingo kartice/plošče; Kartice klicatelja/klicni list; Flomastri za suho brisanje; Knjižica z navodili; Magnetni označevalci; Označevalci/žigi; Kletka za številke; Žetoni/ploščice s številkami; Vrtljivo kolo; Škatla/kovček za shranjevanje; Prozorni prekrivni žetoni; Drugo
th: ส่วนประกอบที่รวมมาในชุดบิงโก: ลูกปิงปองบิงโก; การ์ด/กระดานบิงโก; การ์ดเรียก/แผ่นเรียก; ปากกาไวท์บอร์ด; คู่มือการใช้งาน; ตัวทำเครื่องหมายแม่เหล็ก; ตัวทำเครื่องหมาย/ที่แต้ม; กรงหมุนตัวเลข; ชิป/แผ่นตัวเลข; วงล้อหมุน; กล่อง/กระเป๋าเก็บ; ชิปคลุมแบบใส; อื่นๆ
cs: Komponenty balení binga: Míčky na bingo; Karty/hrací plány na bingo; Karty/listy pro vyvolávače; Stíratelné fixy; Návod k použití; Magnetické značky; Značkovače/razítka; Osudí; Očíslované žetony/kameny; Kolo štěstí; Úložný box/kufřík; Průhledné krycí žetony; Jiné
vi: Các thành phần đi kèm của bộ đồ chơi Bingo: Bóng lô tô; Bảng/thẻ lô tô; Thẻ người gọi/bảng gọi; Bút lông bảng; Sách hướng dẫn; Đánh dấu từ tính; Bút đánh dấu/bút chấm; Lồng quay số; Thẻ/phỉnh số; Vòng quay; Hộp/hộp đựng; Phỉnh che trong suốt; Khác
nl: Inbegrepen bingo-onderdelen: Bingoballen; Bingokaarten/-borden; Oproepkaarten/oproeplijst; Whiteboardmarkers; Instructieboekje; Magnetische markers; Markers/stempels; Bingomolen; Nummerfiches/-tegels; Rad; Opbergdoos/-koffer; Transparante afdekfiches; Anders
hu: A bingo játék tartozékai: Bingógolyók; Bingókártyák / táblák; Húzókártyák / bemondólap; Szárazon törölhető filcek; Használati útmutató; Mágneses jelölők; Jelölők/pecsétek; Golyóhúzó ketrec; Számzsetonok / lapkák; Pörgetőkerék; Tárolódoboz / tok; Átlátszó fedőzsetonok; Egyéb
pl: Dołączono elementy do Bingo: Kule do bingo; Karty/plansze do bingo; Karty/arkusz dla prowadzącego; Markery suchościeralne; Instrukcja gry; Magnetyczne znaczniki; Pisaki/pieczątki; Kołowrotek losujący; Żetony/płytki z numerami; Koło do losowania; Pudełko/etui do przechowywania; Przezroczyste żetony przykrywające; Inne
pt-PT: Componentes do bingo incluídos: Bolas de bingo; Cartões/quadros de bingo; Cartões/folha de chamadas; Marcadores de limpeza a seco; Folheto de instruções; Marcadores magnéticos; Marcadores; Gaiola de números; Fichas/peças de números; Roda giratória; Caixa de armazenamento/estojo; Fichas de cobertura transparente; Outros